District of Columbia statutes.
34-1248.01

Repealed

Obtaining services without compensation unlawful.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 49A
as added Mar. 16, 1988, D.C. Law 7-93, § 3(b), 35 DCR 721
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1848.1.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).
Short title: The first section of D.C. Law 7-93 provided: “That this act may be cited as the ‘Cable Television Communications Act of 1981 Amendment Act of 1987’.”
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-93, the Cable Television Communications Act of 1981 Amendment Act of 1987, see Mayor’s Order 90-137, October 17, 1990.